Washington statutes.
RCW 10.05.100

Conviction of similar offense. (Effective until January 1, 2026.)

If a petitioner is subsequently convicted of a similar offense that was committed while the petitioner was in a deferred prosecution program, upon notice the court shall remove the petitioner's docket from the deferred prosecution file and the court shall enter judgment pursuant to RCW 10.05.020.

[ 1998 c 208 s 2; 1985 c 352 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1998 c 208: See note following RCW 10.05.010.

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.

PDFRCW 10.05.100

Conviction of similar offense. (Effective January 1, 2026.)

If a petitioner is subsequently convicted of a similar offense that was committed while the petitioner was in a deferred prosecution, upon notice the court shall remove the petitioner's docket from the deferred prosecution file and the court shall enter judgment pursuant to RCW 10.05.020.

[ 2024 c 306 s 19; 1998 c 208 s 2; 1985 c 352 s 13; 1975 1st ex.s. c 244 s 10.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2024 c 306: See note following RCW 9.94A.661.

Effective date—1998 c 208: See note following RCW 10.05.010.

Legislative finding—Severability—1985 c 352: See notes following RCW 10.05.010.